en: Washers
xx: Washers
cs: Podložky
da: Spændeskiver
de: Unterlegscheiben
es: Arandelas
fr: Rondelles
it: Guarnizioni
ja: ワッシャー
nl: Sluitringen
no: Skiver
pl: Uszczelki
pt: Arruelas
ru: Мойки
sv: Underläggsbrickor
tr: Pullar

en: Hinges
xx: Hinges
cs: Závěsy
da: Hængsler
de: Scharniere
es: Bisagras
fr: Charnières, Amortisseur mécanique pour meuble
it: Cerniere
ja: ヒンジ
nl: Scharnieren
no: Hengsler
pl: Zawiasy
pt: Dobradiças
ru: Шарниры
sv: Gångjärn
tr: Menteşeler

en: Hooks\, Buckles & Fasteners
xx: Hooks\, Buckles & Fasteners
cs: Háčky\, spony a spojky
da: Kroge\, spænder og befæstelseselementer
de: Haken\, Schnallen & Verschlüsse
es: Ganchos\, hebillas y cierres
fr: Crochets\, boucles et attaches
it: Cerniere\, ganci e fibbie
ja: フック・バックル
nl: Haken\, spanbanden en bevestigingsmateriaal
no: Kroker\, spenner og festeanordninger
pl: Haki\, klamry i łączniki
pt: Ganchos\, fivelas e prendedores
ru: Крючки\, скобы и зажимы
sv: Krokar\, spännen och fästen
tr: Kancalar\, Tokalar ve Sabitleyiciler

en: Chain Connectors & Links
xx: Chain Connectors & Links
cs: Řetězová oka a spojky
da: Kædeled
de: Kettenverbinder & -glieder
es: Eslabones y conectores de cadenas
fr: Maillons et mailles d'accouplement pour chaînes
it: Maglie e connettori per catene
ja: チェーン接続用具・ジョイント
nl: Kettingschakels
no: Kjettinglenker og -koblere
pl: Spinki i ogniwa łańcuchów
pt: Conectores de correntes
ru: Планки и звенья цепей
sv: Kedjelås och -länkar
tr: Zincir Ara Parçaları ve Bağlantıları

en: Gear Ties
xx: Gear Ties
cs: Vázací dráty
da: Gear Ties
de: Gear Tie-Universalkabelbinder
es: Bridas de sujeción
fr: Attaches flexibles
it: Fascette varie
ja: ギアータイ
nl: Allesbinders
no: Utstyrsbånd
pl: Opaski uniwersalne
pt: Abraçadeiras
ru: Многоразовые скрутки
sv: Fästband
tr: Eşya Bağları

en: Lifting Hooks\, Clamps & Shackles
xx: Lifting Hooks\, Clamps & Shackles
cs: Zvedací háky\, svorky a spony
da: Løftekroge\, bøjler og sjækler
de: Lasthaken\, Trageklemmen & Schäkel
es: Ganchos de grúa\, abrazaderas y grilletes
fr: Crochets\, pinces et manilles de levage
it: Ganci di sollevamento\, morsetti e moschettoni
ja: 吊りフック・クランプ
nl: Hijsogen\, -klemmen en -haken
no: Løftekroker\, -klemmer og -bøyler
pl: Haki do podnoszenia\, zaciski i szekle
pt: Ganchos\, braçadeiras e correntes
ru: Подъёмные крюки\, зажимы и хомуты
sv: Lyftkrokar\, klämmor och schacklar
tr: Kaldırma Kancaları\, Kelepçeleri ve Prangaları

en: Utility Buckles
xx: Utility Buckles
cs: Přezky a spony
da: Spænder
de: Schnallen- & Steckschnallen
es: Hebillas para cinturones de herramientas
fr: Attaches industrielles
it: Fibbie per usi pratici
ja: バックル類
nl: Veiligheidsgespen
no: Selespenner
pl: Praktyczne klamry
pt: Fivelas
ru: Скобы
sv: Spännen
tr: Kayış Tokaları

en: Lubrication Hoses
xx: Lubrication Hoses
cs: Mazací hadice
da: Smøremiddelslanger
de: Schmierschläuche
es: Mangueras de lubricación
fr: Tuyaux de lubrification
it: Tubi di lubrificazione
ja: 耐油ホース
nl: Smeerslangen
no: Smøreslanger
pl: Węże do lubryfikacji
pt: Mangueiras de lubrificação
ru: Смазочные шланги
sv: Glidmedelsslangar
tr: Yağlama Hortumları

en: Metal Casting Molds
xx: Metal Casting Molds
cs: Formy na odlévání kovu
da: Forme til metalstøbning
de: Metallgussformen
es: Moldes de fundición de metal
fr: Moules de fonderie
it: Stampi per fusione di metalli
ja: 鋳型
nl: Metaalgietvormen
no: Metallstøpeformer
pl: Formy do odlewów metalowych
pt: Fôrmas para fundição de metal
ru: Формы для отливки металла
sv: Gjutformar för metall
tr: Metal Döküm Kalıpları

en: Moving & Soundproofing Blankets & Covers
xx: Moving & Soundproofing Blankets & Covers
cs: Ochranné a odhlučňovací deky a potahy
da: Flytte- og lyddæmpningstæpper
de: Transport- und Schallschutzabdeckungen
es: Material de insonorización y transporte
fr: Couvertures et draps insonorisés et de protection
it: Coperte e coperture per spostamenti e isolamento acustico
ja: 養生パッド、防音シート、養生カバー、防音カバー
nl: Verhuis- en geluidsisolatiedekens
no: Transportovertrekk og lyddempingsdekke
pl: Pokrowce meblowe do przeprowadzek
pt: Mantas e cobertores para transporte e insonorização
ru: Чехлы для мебели и аппаратуры
sv: Filtar och skydd vid flytt och ljudisolering
tr: Hareketli ve Ses Geçirmez Şilteler ve Kılıflar

en: Pneumatic Hoses
xx: Pneumatic Hoses
cs: Pneumatické hadičky
da: Trykluftsslanger
de: Luftschläuche
es: Mangueras neumáticas
fr: Tuyaux pneumatiques
it: Tubi pneumatici
ja: 耐圧ホース
nl: Pneumatische slangen
no: Trykkluftslanger
pl: Węże pneumatyczne
pt: Mangueiras pneumáticas
ru: Пневматические шланги
sv: Pneumatiska slangar
tr: Pnömatik Hortumlar

en: Post Base Plates
xx: Post Base Plates
cs: Patky sloupů
da: Stolpefødder
de: Standfüße für Pfosten
es: Placas de base para postes
fr: Plaques pour embases de poteaux
it: Piastre base per pali
ja: 支柱固定金具
nl: Voetplaten voor palen
no: Stolpefester
pl: Podstawy słupów
pt: Chapas de suporte para postes
ru: Опорные плиты для столбов
sv: Stolphållare; Stolpfästen med platta
tr: Direk Ayağı Tabanları

en: Springs
xx: Springs
cs: Pružiny
da: Fjedre
de: Federn
es: Cilindros
fr: Ressorts de quincaillerie
it: Molle
ja: バネ
nl: Veren
no: Fjærer
pl: Sprężyny
pt: Molas
ru: Пружины
sv: Fjädrar
tr: Yaylar

en: Spring clamps
de: Leimklemmen
fi: Liimapuristin
fr: Pince à ressort
nb: Limklemme
nl: Lijmklem
pl: Ścisk do klejenia
sv: Limklämmor

en: Tarps
xx: Tarps
cs: Nepromokavé plachty
da: Presenninger
de: Planen
es: Lonas impermeables
fr: Bâches
it: Teloni di plastica
ja: 防水シート
nl: Afdekdoeken
no: Presenninger
pl: Plandeki wodoodporne
pt: Lonas
ru: Брезент
sv: Presenningar
tr: Brandalar

en: Tool Storage & Organization
xx: Tool Storage & Organization
cs: Ukládání a organizace nářadí
da: Værktøjsopbevaring og -organisering
de: Werkzeugaufbewahrung & Ordnungssysteme
es: Organización y almacenamiento de herramientas
fr: Organisation et rangement d'outils, Range-outils
it: Conservazione/ordine attrezzi
ja: 工具保管用品
nl: Gereedschapopslag en -indeling
no: Oppbevaring og organisering av verktøy
pl: Przechowywanie i porządkowanie narzędzi
pt: Porta-ferramentas
ru: Товары для хранения инструментов
sv: Förvaring och organisering av verktyg
tr: Alet Saklama ve Düzenleme

en: Garden Hose Storage
xx: Garden Hose Storage
cs: Držáky zahradních hadic
da: Opbevaring af haveslanger
de: Gartenschlauchhalterungen
es: Soporte de manguera de jardín
fr: Porte-tuyau d'arrosage
it: Portacanna dell'acqua
ja: ホース保管用品
nl: Tuinslang opbergen
no: Oppbevaring av hageslanger
pl: Przechowywanie węży ogrodowych
pt: Suporte para mangueiras de jardim
ru: Катушки для садовых шлангов
sv: Vattenslangsförvaring
tr: Bahçe Hortumu Saklama Kutuları

en: Tool & Equipment Belts
xx: Tool & Equipment Belts
cs: Opasky na nářadí
da: Værktøjsbælter
de: Dienst- & Werkzeuggürtel
es: Cinturones de trabajo y de herramientas
fr: Ceintures de service et porte-outils
it: Cinture portautensili
ja: 工具ベルト
nl: Gereedschapsriemen
no: Verktøys- og utstyrsbelter
pl: Pasy na narzędzia
pt: Cintos para ferramentas
ru: Пояса для инструментов
sv: Verktygsbälten
tr: Alet Kemerleri ve Palaskalar

en: Tool Bags
xx: Tool Bags
cs: Brašny na nářadí
da: Værktøjstasker
de: Werkzeugtaschen
es: Bolsas para herramientas
fr: Sacs à outils
it: Borse porta-attrezzi
ja: 工具袋
nl: Gereedschapstassen
no: Verktøyvesker
pl: Torby na narzędzia
pt: Sacolas para ferramentas
ru: Сумки для инструментов
sv: Verktygspåsar
tr: Alet Çantaları

en: Tool Boxes
xx: Tool Boxes
cs: Boxy na nářadí
da: Værktøjskasser
de: Werkzeugkästen
es: Cajas de herramientas
fr: Boîtes à outils
it: Cassette degli attrezzi
ja: 工具箱
nl: Gereedschapskisten
no: Verktøykasser
pl: Skrzynki narzędziowe
pt: Caixas de ferramentas
ru: Ящики для инструментов
sv: Verktygslådor
tr: Takım Çantaları